Arkansas, session 2025, HB1499.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 22-6-601(a), concerning the sale procedure
for public property, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) The several state boards or commissions having supervision
of the affairs of the charitable, penal, correctional, educational, and other
institutions of the State of Arkansas, and all other state boards and
commissions, except the State Highway Commission, the Arkansas State Game and
Fish Commission, the Arkansas Natural Heritage Commission, the State Parks,
Recreation, and Travel Commission, the Division of Higher Education, and
institutions of higher education, and the executive heads of all state
offices, departments, divisions, and agencies, all referred to separately as
“state agency”, may sell or purchase, for cash in hand and upon compliance
with the provisions of this section, the lands, in whole or in part,
belonging to or under the supervision or control of the respective state
agency or belonging to the state and held for the use or benefit of the state
agency.
(B) State agencies may purchase lands, so that the lands,
in whole or in part, shall belong to or be under the supervision or control
of the respective state agency or belong to the state and be held for the use
*JLL148*
02-24-2025 09:47:47 JLL148

As Engrossed: H2/24/25 HB1499
or benefit of the state agency.
(2) The provisions of this section shall not apply to:
(A) The sale of land by the Commissioner of State Lands;
(B) The transfer of state lands to political subdivisions
of the State of Arkansas;
(C) The transfer of state lands between state entities; or
(D) The exchange of state lands for other lands which are
suitable for state purposes if the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration has made a recommendation to the Governor that the exchange be
made and if the Governor has approved the exchange;
(E) The State Highway Commission;
(F) The Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission;
(G) The Arkansas Natural Heritage Commission;
(H) The State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission;
(I) The Division of Higher Education; or
(J) An institution of higher education.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 22-6-601(c)(1), concerning the sale
procedure for public property, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) In the event that a state agency elects to sell certain any of
its lands or to purchase lands, the state agency shall certify submit its
proposal for the sale or purchase of land to the Building Authority Division
its proposal for any sale or purchase for approval before obtaining an
appraisal of the land.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 22-6-601(c)(2)(A), concerning the sale
procedure for public property, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) The If a proposal for the sale or purchase of land
submitted under subdivision (c)(1) of this section is approved by the
Building Authority Division, the state agency proposing the sale or purchase
of land shall obtain the services of a qualified appraiser to appraise the
lands so proposed to be sold or purchased, with notice to the Secretary of
the Department of Transformation and Shared Services.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 22-6-601(c), concerning the sale procedure
for public property, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as
02-24-2025 09:47:47 JLL148

As Engrossed: H2/24/25 HB1499
follows:
(3) A state agency proposing the sale or purchase of land shall
submit the appraisal obtained under this section to the Building Authority
Division for assessment and recommendation to the Secretary of the Department
of Transformation and Shared Services.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 22-6-601(k) and (l), concerning the sale
procedure for public property, are amended to read as follows:
(k)(1) Before any state agency may receive donated land, the state
agency director shall certify the proposed donation request to the Building
Authority Division.
(2) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Services shall forward a recommendation to the Governor.
(3) No donation shall be made accepted without approval from the
Governor.
(l) Before a state agency purchases real property, the state agency
shall consult the Arkansas Buildings & Sites Database maintained by the
Arkansas Economic Development Commission Building Authority Division to
determine if there is a property available for purchase that meets the
practical and financial needs and specifications of the state agency.

/s/Ray














02-24-2025 09:47:47 JLL148